Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.070

Election on adoption of charter—Notice.

Within five days after the filing with the city clerk of affidavits of publication, which affidavits shall be filed immediately after the last publication, the legislative authority of the city shall initiate the proceedings for the submission of the proposed charter to the qualified voters of the city for their adoption or rejection at either a general or special election. At this election the first officers to serve under the provisions of the proposed charter shall also be elected. In electing from wards, the division into wards as specified in the proposed charter shall govern; in all other respects the then existing laws relating to such election shall govern. The notice shall specify the objects for which the election is held, and shall be given as required by law.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 9; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.070. Prior: (i) 1890 p 216 s 3, part; RRS s 8953, part. (ii) 1890 p 223 s 6, part; RRS s 8977, part.]

NOTES:

Election on adoption of charter, notice: State Constitution Art. 11 s 10 (Amendment 40).